Oklahoma, session 2025, SB547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2602, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2602. A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the following minors may consent to have services provided by health
professionals in the following cases:
1. Any minor who is married, has a dependent child, or is
emancipated;
2. Any minor who is separated from his or her parents or legal
guardian for whatever reason and is not supported by his or her
parents or guardian;
3. Any minor who is or has been pregnant, or afflicted with any
reportable communicable disease, drug and substance abuse, or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB547 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

abus ive use of alcohol; provided, however, that such self-consent
only applies to the prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of those
conditions specified in this section. Any health professional who
accepts the responsibility of providing such health services also
assumes the obligation to provide counseling for the minor by a
health professional. If the minor is found not to be pregnant nor
suffering from a communicable disease, nor drug or substance abuse,
nor abusive use of alcohol, the health professional shall not reveal
any information whatsoever to the spouse, parent, or legal guardian,
without the consent of the minor;
4. Any minor parent as to his or her child;
5. Any spouse of a minor when the minor is unable to give
consent by reason of physical or mental incapacity;
6. Any minor who by reason of physical or mental capacity
cannot give consent and has no known relatives or legal guardian, if
two physicians agree on the health service to be given;
7. Any minor in need of emergency services for conditions which
will endanger his or her health or life if delay would result by
obtaining consent from his or her spouse, parent, or legal guardian;
provided, however, that the prescribing of any medicine or device
for the prevention of pregnancy shall not be considered such an
emergency service; or


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB547 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

8. Any minor who is the victim of sexual assault; provided,
however, that such self-consent only applies to a forensic medical
examination by a qualified licensed health care professional.
B. If any minor falsely represents that he or she may give
consent and a health professional provides health services in good
faith based upon that misrepresentation, the minor shall receive
full services without the consent of the minor’s parent or legal
guardian and the health professional shall incur no liability except
for negligence or intentional harm. Consent of the minor shall not
be subject to later disaffirmance or revocation because of his or
her minority.
B. C. 1. The health professional shall be required to make a
reasonable attempt to inform the spouse, parent, or legal guardian
of the minor of any treatment needed or provided under paragraph 7
of subsection A of this section.
2. In all other instances the health professional may, but
shall not be required to, inform the spouse, parent, or legal
guardian of the minor of any treatment needed or provided. The
judgment of the health professional as to notification shall be
final, and his or her disclosure shall not constitute libel,
slander, the breach of the right of privacy, the breach of the rule
of privileged communication, or result in any other breach that
would incur liability.
D. 1. Except as provided by paragraph 2 of this subsection:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB547 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. the parent or legal guardian of a minor shall have the
right to access and review all medical records of the
minor, and
b. a health professional shall not prevent or restrict
access to the minor’s medical records by the parent or
legal guardian.
2. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to cases:
a. as described in paragraphs 1, 2, 5, and 6 of
subsection A of this section,
b. where such access and review is prohibited by law, or
c. where the parent is the subject of an investigation of
a crime committed against the minor child and a law
enforcement official requests that the information not
be released.
E. Information about the minor obtained through care by a
health professional under the provisions of this act Section 2601 et
seq. of this title shall not be disseminated to any health
professional, school, law enforcement agency or official, court
authority, government agency, or official employer, without the
consent of the minor, except through specific legal requirements or
if the giving of the information is necessary to the health of the
minor and public. Statistical reporting may be done when the
minor’s identity is kept confidential.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB547 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

F. The health professional shall not incur criminal liability
for action under the provisions of this act Section 2601 et seq. of
this title except for negligence or intentional harm.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
February 17, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS



















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB547 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)